Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.08
Clerk of the county or district court; depositories; statement of funds.

Each depository shall furnish directly to the county board a sworn monthly statement of the funds of the county judge, clerk of the county court, and clerk of the district court on deposit in such depository. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 8, p. 870;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 49;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 37;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 49.